Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 4. Name

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 228 to 240.

18 C.J.S. Corporations §§ 98 to 110.

§ 17-16-401.
Corporate name.

A corporate name may not contain language stating or implying that the corporation is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by W.S.

17-16-301

and its articles of incorporation.

Except as authorized by subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a corporate name shall not be the same as, or deceptively similar to any trademark or service mark registered in this state and shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of any profit or nonprofit corporation, trade name, limited liability company, statutory trust company, statutory foundation, limited partnership or other business entity organized, continued or domesticated under the laws of this state or licensed or registered as a foreign profit or nonprofit corporation, foreign limited partnership, foreign joint stock company, foreign statutory trust company, foreign foundation, foreign limited liability company or other foreign business entity in this state or any fictitious or reserved name.

A corporation may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the secretary of state’s records from one (1) or more of the names described in subsection (b) of this section. The secretary of state shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

The other person whose name is not distinguishable from the name which the applicant desires to register or reserve, irrevocably consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of the applicant; or

The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant’s right to use the name applied for in this state.

A corporation may use the name, including the fictitious name, of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state and the proposed user corporation:

Has merged with the other corporation; or

Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation; or

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 80, § 3.

Where the other corporation is affiliated with the proposed user corporation and has consented in writing to the use of the name by the proposed user corporation, and the written consent also sets forth a description of a proposed merger, consolidation, dissolution, amendment to articles of incorporation or other intended corporate action which establishes to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that the coexistence of two (2) corporations using the same name will not continue for more than one hundred twenty (120) days.

This act does not control the use of fictitious names.

A name is distinguishable from other names, on the records of the secretary of state, if it contains one (1) or more different letters or numerals, or if it has a different sequence of letters or numerals from the other names on the secretary of state’s records. Differences which are not distinguishable are:

The words or abbreviations of the words “corporation,” “company,” “incorporated,” “limited partnership,” “L.P.,” “limited,” “ltd.,” “limited liability company,” “limited company,” “L.C.” or “L.L.C.”;

The presence or absence of the words or symbols of the words “the,” “and” or “a”;

Differences in punctuation and special characters;

Differences in capitalization; or

Differences between singular and plural forms of words.

The secretary of state has the power and authority reasonably necessary to interpret and efficiently administer this section and to perform the duties imposed by this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1996, ch. 80, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2019 ch. 190, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “upon the secretary of state's records” in the introductory language of (c), and “upon the records of the secretary of state” in (c)(i); added (d)(v), and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), added “statutory foundation” following “statutory trust company,” and “foreign foundation” following “foreign statutory trust company.”

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Section has no application to a nonprofit corporation.

American Legal Aid, Inc. v. Legal Aid Servs., Inc., 503 P.2d 1201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1972).

Confusion caused by trade name must be such as to warrant injunction.

That is, potential customers must be confused or deceived into patronizing one corporation in the mistaken belief that they are dealing with another corporation. Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Security Bank & Trust Co., 572 P.2d 1120,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1977).

Burden of proving trade name confusing. —

Unless a trade name is confusing and deceptive on its face, those seeking such protection must take the burden of proving that they have given to their trade names a secondary meaning through years of usage and if in this case defendant was to be allowed to use its new name, the public would be confused by its similarity to the trade names of plaintiffs. Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Security Bank & Trust Co., 572 P.2d 1120,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1977).

Concepts with respect to trade names containing geographic and generic words. —

See Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Security Bank & Trust Co., 572 P.2d 1120,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to protection of corporate name as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state, 26 ALR3d 994.

Incorporation of company under particular name as creating exclusive right to such name, 68 ALR3d 1168.

Use of “family name” by corporation as unfair competition, 72 ALR3d 8.

§ 17-16-402.
Reserved name.

A person may apply to reserve the exclusive use of a corporate name, including a fictitious name for a foreign corporation whose corporate name is not available, by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application shall set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the corporate name applied for is available, he shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a nonrenewable one hundred twenty (120) day period.

The owner of a reserved corporate name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a manually signed notice of the transfer that states the name and address of the transferee.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “file the application pursuant to W.S.

17-16-125

and” after “available, he shall” in the last sentence of (a).

§ 17-16-403.
Reserved.